Washington statutes.
RCW 36.05.080

"Territory" defined.

The term "territory," as used in this chapter, means that portion of counties lying along the boundary line and within one mile on either side thereof.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.05.080. Prior: 1897 c 76 s 4; RRS s 3967.]